District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-2207.01

Smoke screens prohibited.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1124, ch. 443, § 11
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 7, 29 DCR 3138
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 12, 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-718.
1973 Ed., § 40-610.

Editor's Notes

Definitions applicable: For definitions applicable in this section, see § 50-2201.02.